Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB796.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 134.490 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Within thirty (30)[fifty (50)] days after the delivery of a certificate of
delinquency by the clerk to a third-party purchaser, the third-party purchaser
shall send a notice to the delinquent taxpayer informing the delinquent
taxpayer that the certificate of delinquency has been purchased by the third-
party purchaser.
(b) The third-party purchaser shall send this notice once every six (6)
months[At least annually thereafter,] until the notice required by subsection
(2) of this section is sent[, the third-party purchaser shall send a notice to the
delinquent taxpayer].
(c) The notices included in this subsection shall be sent by certified mail with
proof of mailing and include the information required by subsection (3)(d) of
this section. A copy of each notice shall be sent to each mortgagee who holds
a mortgage on the property that is the subject of the certificate of delinquency.
(2) Anytime after the expiration of the one (1) year tolling period established by KRS
134.546, the third-party purchaser may institute an action to collect the amount due
on a certificate of delinquency. At least forty-five (45) days before instituting a
legal action, the third-party purchaser shall send a notice to the taxpayer and a copy
of the notice to each mortgagee who holds a mortgage on the property by certified
mail with proof of mailing. The notice shall:
(a) Inform the taxpayer that enforcement action will be taken;
(b) Include a statement advising the taxpayer that substantial additional
administrative costs and fees associated with collection in addition to the
amount due on the certificate of delinquency may be imposed and that
collection actions may include foreclosure; and
Page 1 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
(c) Include the information required by subsection (3) of this section.
The notice shall be in addition to any notice sent under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) (a) 1. For certificates of delinquency for all property except property described
in paragraph (b) of this subsection, third-party purchasers or their
designees shall obtain from the office of the property valuation
administrator of the county in which the real property is located the
most recent address for the property owner.
2. To obtain information from the office of the property valuation
administrator, the third-party purchaser shall, at the option of the
property valuation administrator, either:
a. Obtain information from an up-to-date public access list or
website[Web site] offered by the property valuation administrator;
or
b. Submit a list of addresses, map identification numbers, or parcel
numbers for which updated information is requested to the
property valuation administrator, who shall update his or her
records with regard to the properties for which information is
requested and provide the updated information to the third-party
purchaser within ten (10) days.
3. For this service, the property valuation administrator may charge a fee
not to exceed two dollars ($2) for each address provided or obtained.
4. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the third-party
purchaser shall send the notices required by subsections (1) and (2) of
this section to the address provided by the property valuation
administrator. Unless the provisions of subparagraph 7. of this
paragraph apply, the third-party purchaser shall not be required to send a
Page 2 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
notice to any party other than the owner of record as provided by the
property valuation administrator at the time the notice is sent and the
mortgagee as required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
5. If, due to insufficient staffing, the property valuation administrator is
unable to provide the requested information to the third-party purchaser
within ten (10) days of submission, the property valuation administrator
shall immediately notify the third-party purchaser, and the third-party
purchaser may send the notices required by subsections (1) and (2) of
this section to the address reflected in the public records of the property
valuation administrator.
6. Any notices sent pursuant to information obtained under this paragraph
that are returned as undeliverable shall be re-sent by certified mail with
proof of mailing addressed to the "Occupant" at the address of the
property that is the subject of the certificate of delinquency. These
notices shall be sent within twenty (20) days of receipt of the returned
notice.
7. If a third-party purchaser becomes aware of a more recent or more
accurate address for a delinquent taxpayer that is different from the
address reflected in the records of the property valuation administrator,
the third-party purchaser shall send notices to the updated address in the
manner required by this subsection, and shall notify the property
valuation administrator of the updated address.
8. If a third-party purchaser receives an address from the property
valuation administrator during an address check after a first notice is
sent and returned as undeliverable, and the address is the same as was
originally provided, the third-party purchaser shall send the notice
addressed to "Occupant" at the address of the property that is the subject
Page 3 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
of the certificate of delinquency in the manner required by this
subsection.
(b) 1. For certificates of delinquency relating to unmined coal, oil or gas
reserves, or any other mineral or energy resources assessed separately
from the surface real property pursuant to KRS 132.820, third-party
purchasers or their designees shall obtain from the department the most
recent address for the property owner.
2. To obtain information about a particular property, the third-party
purchaser shall submit to the department a list of addresses, map
identification numbers, parcel numbers, and any other information the
department may require. The department shall:
a. Update its records with regard to the properties for which
information is requested; and
b. Provide the updated information to the third-party purchaser
within ten (10) business days.
3. For this service, the department may charge a fee not to exceed two
dollars ($2) for each address provided.
4. The third-party purchaser shall send the notices required by subsections
(1) and (2) of this section relating to unmined coal, oil or gas reserves,
or any other mineral or energy resources assessed separately from the
surface real property pursuant to KRS 132.820 to the address provided
by the department. Unless the provisions of subparagraph 5.f. of this
paragraph apply, the third-party purchaser shall not be required to send a
notice to any party other than the owner of record as provided by the
department at the time the notice is sent and the mortgagee as required
by subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
5. a. Any notice sent pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section
Page 4 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
based on information obtained pursuant to this paragraph and
returned as undeliverable shall be submitted to the department
within ten (10) days of receipt of the returned notice.
b. The department shall attempt to obtain an updated address for the
owner of the property subject to the certificate of delinquency
from the individual or entity filing the property tax return for the
property.
c. The individual or entity filing the property tax return shall provide
an address of the property owner upon request of the department.
d. The department shall provide any updated address information to
the third-party purchaser.
e. If updated information is provided, the notices shall be re-sent by
certified mail with proof of mailing to the updated address of the
owner within ten (10) days of the receipt of the updated
information from the department.
f. If a third-party purchaser becomes aware of a more recent or more
accurate address for a delinquent taxpayer that is different from the
address reflected in the records of the department, the third-party
purchaser shall send notices to the updated address in the manner
required by this subsection, and shall notify the department of the
updated address.
(c) The third-party purchaser shall maintain complete and accurate records of all
notices sent pursuant to this section.
(d) The notices required by this section shall include the following information:
1. A statement that the certificate of delinquency is a lien of record against
the property for which delinquent taxes are owed;
2. A statement that the certificate bears interest at the rate provided in KRS
Page 5 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
134.125;
3. A statement that if the certificate is not paid, it will be subject to
collection as provided by law, and that collection actions may include
foreclosure. The notice required by subsection (2) of this section shall
also include a statement of the intent to institute legal action to collect
the amount due;
4. A complete listing of the amount due, as of the date of the notice,
broken down as follows:
a. The purchase price of the certificate of delinquency;
b. Interest accrued subsequent to the purchase of the certificate of
delinquency; and
c. Fees imposed by the third-party purchaser;
5. If the third-party purchaser is required to register with the department as
provided in KRS 134.128(3), for certificates of delinquency purchased
after June 1, 2012, a statement informing the taxpayer that upon written
request and the payment of a processing fee, the third-party purchaser
will offer a payment plan; and
6. Information, in a format and with content as determined by the
department, detailing the provisions of the law relating to third-party
purchaser fees and charges.
(e) In addition, the notice shall provide the following information to the taxpayer:
1. The legal name of the third-party purchaser;
2. The third-party purchaser's physical address;
3. The third-party purchaser's mailing address for payments, if different
from the physical address; and
4. The third-party purchaser's telephone number.
If the information required by this paragraph changes, the third-party
Page 6 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
purchaser shall, within thirty (30) days of the change becoming effective, send
a notice to each taxpayer by certified mail with proof of mailing with the
corrected information. The third-party purchaser shall also update contact
information included in the records of the county clerk within ten (10) days of
the change becoming effective. Failure to send the original notice or any
correction notices shall result in the suspension of the accrual of all interest
and any fees incurred by the third-party purchaser after that date until proper
notice is given as required by this subsection.
(4) If a person entitled to pay a certificate of delinquency to a third-party purchaser
makes payment on the certificate of delinquency to the county clerk under the
conditions described in KRS 134.127(3)(d), the payment shall constitute payment in
full, and no other amounts may be collected by the third-party purchaser from the
person.
(5) (a) For certificates of delinquency purchased after June 1, 2012, at the written
request of a delinquent taxpayer, a third-party purchaser required to register
with the department as provided in KRS 134.128(3) shall provide a monthly
installment payment plan to a taxpayer.
(b) The taxpayer and third-party purchaser shall sign an agreement detailing the
terms of the installment payment plan.
(c) The third-party purchaser may impose a processing fee, not to exceed eight
dollars ($8) per month to offset the administrative cost of providing the
payment plan. No other fees, charges, interest, or other amounts not expressly
authorized by this chapter shall be charged, assessed, or collected by the third-
party purchaser.
(d) The existence of an agreement to provide a payment plan shall not impact the
right of the third-party purchaser to pursue legal action if the delinquent
taxpayer fails to follow the terms of the installment payment agreement.
Page 7 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
(e) Upon default of a delinquent taxpayer:
1. The third-party purchaser shall retain all amounts paid, which shall be
applied to the outstanding balance due; and
2. The third-party purchaser shall not be required to offer the delinquent
taxpayer another opportunity for an installment payment plan.
(f) If a third-party purchaser who was required to offer payment plans pursuant to
paragraph (a) of this subsection, subsequently does not purchase a sufficient
number of certificates of delinquency to require registration with the
department, the third-party purchaser shall continue to offer payment plans
under the conditions established by this subsection for all delinquent
taxpayers whose certificates of delinquency were purchased during a period in
which the third-party purchaser was required to register with the department.
(g) A third-party purchaser who is not required to register with the department as
provided in KRS 134.128(3), or who holds certificates of delinquency
purchased prior to June 1, 2012, may voluntarily offer installment payment
plans to delinquent taxpayers in accordance with the provisions of this
subsection.
(h) The department may establish additional terms and conditions for installment
payment plans in an administrative regulation.
(6) Any person to whom a third-party purchaser transfers or assigns a certificate of
delinquency shall be considered a third-party purchaser under this chapter.
Section 2. KRS 134.504 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall be responsible for the collection of certificates of delinquency
and personal property certificates of delinquency. The provisions of this section
relating to certificates of delinquency shall also apply to personal property
certificates of delinquency unless otherwise specifically noted. The department
shall offer the collection duties related to certificates of delinquency and personal
Page 8 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
property certificates of delinquency to the county attorney in each county, unless
the department determines that a county attorney has previously failed to perform
collection duties in a reasonable and acceptable manner.
(2) Any county attorney desiring to perform the collection duties shall enter into a
contract with the department on an annual basis.
(3) The terms of the contract shall specify the duties to be undertaken by the county
attorney, which shall include, at a minimum, the duties set forth in subsection (4) of
this section. The terms of the contract shall also provide that, if the county attorney
fails to perform the duties required by the contract during the contract period, the
department may assume all collection responsibilities.
(4) The following duties shall be performed by the department or the county attorney,
as the case may be, with regard to each certificate of delinquency:
(a) Within thirty (30) days after the establishment of a certificate of delinquency,
the county attorney or the department shall mail a notice by regular mail to the
owner of record on the assessment date at the address on the records of the
property valuation administrator, or to the in-care-of address if an in-care-of
address is provided as required by subsection (5) of this section. The notice
shall:
1. Include the name, address, and telephone number of a contact person in
the county attorney's office or the department, as the case may be;
2. Advise that:
a. The certificate of delinquency is a lien of record against the
property on which the taxes are due;
b. The amounts due are a personal obligation of the taxpayer on the
assessment date; and
c. The certificate bears interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%)
and, if not paid, will be subject to collection by the county attorney
Page 9 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
or the department as provided by law;
3. Include the total amount due as of the date of the notice;
4. Include in bold print in at least twelve (12) point font, a statement
advising the taxpayer that anytime after ninety (90) days from the
creation of the certificate of delinquency, the certificate of delinquency
may be paid by a third-party purchaser and, that if so paid, the certificate
of delinquency will be subject to collection by the third-party purchaser
as provided by law. The notice shall also advise that a third-party
purchaser may impose substantial additional administrative costs and
fees associated with collection in addition to the amount due on the
certificate of delinquency, and that collection actions may include
foreclosure. This provision shall not be included in notices sent for
personal property certificates of delinquency; [and]
5. Advise that the taxpayer may qualify for a payment plan with the county
attorney or the department, if the taxpayer meets the requirements
established by the county attorney or the department, and if terms are
agreed to prior to the date of the sale; and
6. Notify the taxpayer about the homestead exemption application
process under KRS 132.810.
(b) The county attorney or the department shall file in the office of the county
clerk a list of the names and addresses to which the thirty (30) day notice was
mailed along with a certificate attesting that the notices were mailed in
accordance with the requirements of this section;
(c) 1. All thirty (30) day notices returned as undeliverable shall be submitted
by the county attorney or department to the property valuation
administrator, and a list of the returned notices shall be filed with the
county clerk, who shall record the list in the order book of the county.
Page 10 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
2. The property valuation administrator shall attempt to correct inadequate
or erroneous addresses and, if property has been transferred, shall
determine the new owner, current mailing address, and in-care-of
address, if any, as provided in KRS 382.135.
3. The property valuation administrator shall return the notices with the
corrected information to the county attorney or the department within
twenty (20) days of receipt.
4. Upon receipt of the new information from the property valuation
administrator, the county attorney or the department shall resend the
notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection using the updated
information;
(d) 1. At least twenty (20) days after the mailing of the thirty (30) day notice
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection, but within sixty (60) days
of the establishment of a certificate of delinquency, the county attorney
or department shall send a second notice, by regular mail, to owners of
record whose tax bills remain delinquent, or to the in-care-of addresses
or corrected address, if information regarding a new property owner has
been received by the county attorney or the department under the
provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection. The notice shall include,
at a minimum, the following information:
a. The name, address, and telephone number of a contact person in
the county attorney's office or the department, as the case may be;
b. A statement that a sale of tax claims will be held by the county
clerk on the date established by the department for the sale. The
text of the statement shall include the actual sale date, as well as a
statement noting that the certificate of delinquency may be paid by
a third-party purchaser at the sale, and if the certificate of
Page 11 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
delinquency is paid by a third-party purchaser, it will be subject to
collection by the third-party purchaser as provided by law, that
significant additional collection fees will be imposed by the third-
party purchaser, and that collection actions may include
foreclosure. This statement shall not be included in notices sent to
owners of property subject to a personal property certificate of
delinquency; and
c. A statement that the taxpayer may qualify for a payment plan with
the county attorney or the department, if the taxpayer meets the
requirements established by the county attorney or the department
and if terms are agreed to prior to the date of the sale.
2. The county attorney or the department shall file in the office of the
county clerk a list of the names and addresses to which the sixty (60)
day notice was mailed, along with a certificate attesting that the notices
were mailed in accordance with the requirements of this section.
3. If the notice required by paragraph (c) of this subsection is returned as
undeliverable, and the property valuation administrator is not able to
provide a corrected or updated address, the county attorney or the
department shall address the sixty (60) day notice to "Occupant" and
shall mail the notice to the address of the property to which the
certificate of delinquency applies;
(e) The county attorney or the department shall deliver to the property valuation
administrator, at the same time the notice required by paragraph (d) of this
subsection is sent, a list of the owners whose tax bills remain delinquent. The
property valuation administrator shall review this list in accordance with KRS
132.220 to establish that the properties on the list can be identified and
physically located; and
Page 12 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
(f) Anytime after the expiration of the one (1) year tolling period established by
KRS 134.546, the county attorney or department may institute an action to
collect the amount due on a certificate of delinquency owned by the taxing
jurisdictions and in the possession of the county clerk. At least forty-five (45)
days before instituting a legal action, the county attorney or department shall
send, by regular mail, a notice of intent to initiate legal action to enforce the
lien. The notice shall be sent to the owner of record of the property or to the
in-care-of address or corrected address if either has been provided pursuant to
this section.
(5) If property subject to a certificate of delinquency has been transferred in any year
after the assessment date, the property valuation administrator shall determine the
in-care-of address supplied in the deed pursuant to KRS 382.135 and shall provide
that information to the county attorney or the department.
(6) (a) Failure of the county attorney or the department to mail the notices required in
subsection (4) of this section shall not affect the validity of the claim of the
state, county, school district, and taxing district. However, the county attorney
or the department shall not receive any compensation, commission, or
payment related to any certificate of delinquency for which the notices
required by the provisions of subsection (4) of this section are not sent.
(b) For each notice mailed, one dollar ($1) shall be added to the amount of the
certificate of delinquency, to offset the cost of mailing, and, upon collection,
the county attorney or the department shall be paid such amounts as
reimbursement for mailing costs.
(7) (a) As compensation for the collection duties performed pursuant to a contract
with the department, a county attorney shall be paid twenty percent (20%) of
the amount due each taxing unit during the contract period, whether the
amount is paid voluntarily, through sale, or under court order, and whether the
Page 13 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
amount is paid to the county clerk or the county attorney. The fee for the
county attorney shall be added to the amount of the certificate of delinquency
and shall be paid by the person paying the certificate of delinquency.
(b) If payment in full is voluntarily made by the taxpayer to the county attorney
or county clerk within five (5) days of the filing of the tax claim with the
county clerk, the county attorney fee shall be waived.
(c) If a county attorney files a court action or files a cross-claim, the county
attorney shall be paid an additional fee of thirteen percent (13%) of the
amount of the certificate of delinquency and shall be reimbursed for costs
incident to the court action. The additional fee and costs incident to the
litigation shall be added to the certificate of delinquency and shall be paid by
the person paying the certificate of delinquency.
(d) If more than one (1) county attorney renders necessary services to collect on a
certificate of delinquency, the county attorney serving the last notice or
rendering the last substantial service preceding collection shall be entitled to
the fee.
(8) (a) The county attorney shall establish a system to accept installment payments
from delinquent taxpayers. The county attorney may, during the contract
period, enter into an agreement with a delinquent taxpayer to accept
installment payments on the certificates of delinquency. The agreement shall
not waive the county attorney's right to initiate court action or other
authorized collection activities if the taxpayer does not make payments in
accordance with the agreement.
(b) The county attorney may, upon written request of the taxpayer for good cause
and with agreement of the affected taxing jurisdiction or fee recipient, waive
or reduce fees and penalties that are part of a certificate of delinquency during
settlement or negotiation with a taxpayer in accordance with guidance
Page 14 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
provided by the department.
(9) Any action by the county attorney authorized by this chapter shall be filed on
relation of the commissioner. A copy of any judgment obtained by the county
attorney shall be sent to the department.
(10) (a) The county attorney shall notify the county clerk and the department of the
filing of a suit at the time the suit is filed and of payment agreements at the
time such agreements are entered into. The county clerk shall note on the
certificate of delinquency the filing of the lawsuit or the existence of the
payment agreement, and these certificates of delinquency shall not be
available for purchase or payment by a third-party purchaser.
(b) The county attorney shall provide to the county clerk at least ten (10) days but
not more than twenty (20) days prior to the annual sale date for the county
established pursuant to KRS 134.128, a protected list of current year
certificates of delinquency that are:
1. Under a payment plan with the county attorney on which payments are
current;
2. Involved in litigation initiated by the county attorney or in which the
county attorney responds or files an answer;
3. Involved in bankruptcy litigation in which the county attorney has filed
a claim; or
4. Included on a list of protected properties submitted to the county
attorney by a vacant property review commission or an alternative
government entity as provided in KRS 99.727.
The list shall include sufficient detail for the county clerk to accurately
identify the property.
(c) The county attorney shall notify the county clerk of the failure of any payment
agreement and, upon notification to the clerk, the certificate of delinquency
Page 15 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 260
shall be available for purchase.
(11) The department may make its delinquent tax collection databases and other
technical resources, including but not limited to tax refund offsetting, available to
the county attorney upon request from the county attorney. The county attorney
seeking assistance shall enter into any agreements required by the department to
protect taxpayer confidentiality, to ensure database integrity, or to address the
concerns of the department.
(12) (a) If a county attorney chooses not to contract for collection duties, or if a county
attorney fails to perform the duties required by the contract, the department
shall assume responsibility for all uncollected certificates of delinquency and
personal property certificates of delinquency, including, at the option of the
department, those with pending court action or for which the county attorney
has entered into an installment payment agreement.
(b) If the department assumes or retains responsibility for the collection of
certificates of delinquency and personal property certificates of delinquency,
the twenty percent (20%) fee that would have been paid to the county attorney
under subsection (7) of this section, and any other fees or costs established by
this section for the county attorney shall be paid to the department for deposit
in the delinquent tax fund provided for under KRS 134.552.
Page 16 of 16
XXXX 1/22/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed